Hawaii statutes.
§165-4 Right to farm. No court,
official, public servant, or public employee shall declare any farming
operation a nuisance for any reason if the farming operation has been conducted
in a manner consistent with generally accepted agricultural and management
practices. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a farming operation
does not constitute a nuisance. [L 1982, c 256, pt of §1; am L 1986, c 242, §3;
am L 2001, c 26, §2]

Revision Note

Subsection
designation deleted pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next